Indiana, session 2026, HB1352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-17-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The proper officers of a political subdivision
shall formulate its estimated budget and its proposed tax rate and tax
levy on the form prescribed by the department of local government
finance and approved by the state board of accounts. In formulating a
political subdivision's estimated budget under this section, the proper
officers of the political subdivision must consider the net property tax
revenue that will be collected by the political subdivision during the
ensuing year, after taking into account the estimate by the department
of local government finance under IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1 of the amount by
which the political subdivision's distribution of property taxes will be
reduced by credits under IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.5 in the ensuing year, after
taking into account the estimate by the department of local government
finance under section 0.7 of this chapter of the maximum amount of net
property tax revenue and miscellaneous revenue that the political
subdivision will receive in the ensuing year, and after taking into
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


account all payments for debt service obligations that are to be made
by the political subdivision during the ensuing year. The political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body, if the political subdivision is
subject to section 20 of this chapter, shall submit the following
information to the department's computer gateway:
(1) The estimated budget.
(2) The estimated maximum permissible levy, as provided by the
department under IC 6-1.1-18.5-24.
(3) The current and proposed tax levies of each fund.
(4) The percentage change between the current and proposed tax
levies of each fund.
(5) The amount by which the political subdivision's distribution
of property taxes may be reduced by credits granted under
IC 6-1.1-20.6, as estimated by the department of local government
finance under IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1.
(6) The amounts of excessive levy appeals to be requested.
(7) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will hold a public hearing on the items
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(8) The amount of any increase in the tax rate and tax levies of the
political subdivision in an ordinance adopted under section 23 of
this chapter.
(9) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will meet to fix the budget, tax rate, and
levy under section 5 of this chapter.
(10) The date, time, and place of the final adoption of the budget,
tax rate, and levy under section 5 of this chapter.
Except as provided in section 5.6(b) of this chapter, the political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body shall submit this information to
the department's computer gateway at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by this subsection in the manner prescribed by
the department. If the date, time, or place of the final adoption
subsequently changes, the political subdivision shall update the
information submitted to the department's computer gateway. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers, at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing, through its computer gateway
and provide a telephone number through which taxpayers may request
mailed copies of a political subdivision's information under this
subsection. The department's computer gateway must allow a taxpayer
to search for the information under this subsection by the taxpayer's
address. The department shall review only the submission to the
department's computer gateway for compliance with this section.
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(b) The board of directors of a solid waste management district
established under IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5-2 (before its repeal) may
conduct the public hearing required under subsection (a):
(1) in any county of the solid waste management district; and
(2) in accordance with the annual notice of meetings published
under IC 13-21-5-2.
(c) The trustee of each township in the county shall estimate the
amount necessary to meet the cost of township assistance in the
township for the ensuing calendar year. The township board shall,
subject to section 23 of this chapter, adopt with the township budget a
tax rate sufficient to meet the estimated cost of township assistance.
The taxes collected as a result of the tax rate adopted under this
subsection are credited to the township assistance fund.
(d) A political subdivision for which any of the information under
subsection (a) is not submitted to the department's computer gateway
in the manner prescribed by the department shall have its most recent
annual appropriations and annual tax levy continued for the ensuing
budget year.
(e) If a political subdivision or appropriate fiscal body timely
submits the information under subsection (a) but subsequently
discovers the information contains an error, the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body may submit amended information to the
department's computer gateway. However, submission of an
amendment to information described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(7)
must occur at least ten (10) days before the public hearing held under
subsection (a), and submission of an amendment to information
described in subsection (a)(8) through (a)(9) must occur at least
twenty-four (24) hours before the time in which the meeting to fix the
budget, tax rate, and levy was originally advertised to commence.
(f) Each year, the governing body of a school corporation that
imposes property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals on
a lease for a controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20, property taxes under
an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1, or property taxes
under a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, shall
submit the following information at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by subsection (a) in the manner prescribed by
the department:
(1) the purposes specified in the public question submitted to the
voters or any revenue spending plans adopted under
IC 6-1.1-20-13, IC 20-46-1-8, or IC 20-46-9-6 for:
(A) debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a
controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(B) an operating referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-1; or
(C) a school safety referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-9;
as applicable; and
(2) the debt service levy fund, operating referendum tax levy
fund, or school safety referendum tax levy fund of the school
corporation, whichever is applicable;
to show whether the school corporation is using revenue collected from
the referendum tax levy in the amounts and for the purposes
established in the purposes specified in the public question submitted
to the voters or the revenue spending plan, as applicable. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing.
(g) This subsection applies to budgets for calendar years after
2027 and to property taxes first due and payable after 2027, for a
county that establishes a fire protection and emergency service
district under IC 36-8.1-5. Notwithstanding any other law, the
county fiscal body shall adopt with the county budget the budget
to carry out the county's fire protection and emergency services
powers and duties in the county in accordance with the county fire
protection and emergency services plan under IC 36-8.1-4.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-18-28, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) After December 31, 2027, this section
applies only to a township in a county containing a consolidated
city.
(a) (b) The executive of a township may, upon approval by the
township fiscal body, submit a petition to the department of local
government finance for an increase in the township's maximum
permissible ad valorem property tax levy for its township firefighting
and emergency services fund under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the levies for
the township firefighting fund and township emergency services fund
described in IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2), as applicable, for property taxes for
any year for which a petition is submitted under this section.
(b) (c) If the township submits a petition as provided in subsection
(a) (b) before April 1 of a year, the department of local government
finance shall increase the township's maximum permissible ad valorem
property tax levy for the township firefighting and emergency services
fund under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the combined levies for the township
firefighting fund and township emergency services fund described in
IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2), as applicable, for property taxes first due and
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


payable in the immediately succeeding year by using the following
formula for purposes of subsection (c)(2): (d)(2):
STEP ONE: Determine the percentage increase in the population,
as determined by the township fiscal body and as may be
prescribed by the department of local government finance, that is
within the fire protection and emergency services area of the
township during the ten (10) year period immediately preceding
the year in which the petition is submitted under subsection (a).
(b). The township fiscal body may use the most recently available
population data issued by the Bureau of the Census during the ten
(10) year period immediately preceding the petition.
STEP TWO: Determine the greater of zero (0) or the result of:
(A) the STEP ONE percentage; minus
(B) six percent (6%);
expressed as a decimal.
STEP THREE: Determine a rate that is the lesser of:
(A) fifteen-hundredths (0.15); or
(B) the STEP TWO result.
STEP FOUR: Reduce the STEP THREE rate by any rate increase
in the township's property tax rate or rates for its township
firefighting and emergency services fund, township firefighting
fund, or township emergency services fund, as applicable, within
the immediately preceding ten (10) year period that was made
based on a petition submitted by the township under this section.
(c) (d) The township's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy for its township firefighting and emergency services fund
under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the combined levies for the township
firefighting fund and township emergency services fund described in
IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2) for property taxes first due and payable in a given
year, as adjusted under this section, shall be calculated as:
(1) the amount of the ad valorem property tax levy increase for
the township firefighting and emergency services fund under
IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the combined levies for the township
firefighting fund and township emergency services fund described
in IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2), as applicable, without regard to this
section; plus
(2) an amount equal to the result of:
(A) the rate determined under the formula in subsection (b);
(c); multiplied by
(B) the net assessed value of the fire protection and emergency
services area divided by one hundred (100).
The calculation under this subsection shall be used in the determination
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


of the township's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy
under IC 36-8-13-4 for property taxes first due and payable in the first
year of the increase and thereafter.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-18.5-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. For purposes of determining
the property tax levy limit imposed on a county under STEP ONE
of section 3 of this chapter for 2029, the county ad valorem
property tax levy for 2028 does not include the amount of the
portion of the county's levy attributable to expenses for a county
fire protection and emergency service district established under
IC 36-8.1-5.
SECTION 4. IC 36-2-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.207-2016,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Before the Thursday after the first Monday in
August of each year, the county executive shall prepare an itemized
estimate of all money to be drawn by the members of the executive and
all expenditures to be made by the executive or under its orders during
the next calendar year. Each executive's budget estimate must include:
(1) the expense of construction, repairs, supplies, employees, and
agents, and other expenses at each building or institution
maintained in whole or in part by money paid out of the county
treasury;
(2) the expense of constructing and repairing bridges, itemized by
the location of and amount for each bridge;
(3) the compensation of the attorney representing the county;
(4) the compensation of attorneys for indigents;
(5) the expenses of the county board of health;
(6) the expense of repairing county roads, itemized by the location
of and amount for each repair project;
(7) the estimated number of precincts in the county and the
amount required for election expenses, including compensation
of election commissioners, inspectors, judges, clerks, and sheriffs,
rent, meals, hauling and repair of voting booths and machines,
advertising, printing, stationery, furniture, and supplies;
(8) the amount of principal and interest due on bonds and loans,
itemized for each loan and bond issue;
(9) the amount required to pay judgments, settlements, and court
costs;
(10) the expense of supporting inmates of benevolent or penal
institutions;
(11) the expense of publishing delinquent tax lists;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(12) the amount of compensation of county employees that is
payable out of the county treasury;
(13) the expenses of a multiple county property tax assessment
board of appeals under IC 6-1.1-28-0.1 or of the county property
tax assessment board of appeals under IC 6-1.1-28-1 (as
applicable); and
(14) other expenditures to be made by the executive or under its
orders, specifically itemized; and
(15) the expenses of a county fire and emergency district
established under IC 36-8.1-5.
SECTION 5. IC 36-8-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to:
(1) second and third class cities; and
(2) after December 31, 2027, county fire and emergency
service districts under IC 36-8.1-5 (for purposes of the county
fire department).
It also applies to other units, where specifically indicated.
SECTION 6. IC 36-8-3-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies after December 31, 2027.
(b) If fire protection and emergency services responsibilities are
transferred from a township to the county fire and emergency
service district under IC 36-8.1-5, the county fire and emergency
service district board may by ordinance establish a safety board
for purposes of the county fire department, with the members to be
appointed by the county fire and emergency service district board.
(c) A safety board described in this section has the same powers
and duties under this chapter for purposes of the county fire
department as a municipal safety board has under this chapter for
purposes of a municipal fire department.
SECTION 7. IC 36-8-3.5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. After December 31, 2027, if
fire protection and emergency services responsibilities have been
transferred to a county fire and emergency service district under
IC 36-8.1-5, the county fire and emergency service district board
may establish a merit system under this chapter for the county fire
department.
SECTION 8. IC 36-8-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2005,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to pension benefits for
members of fire departments hired before May 1, 1977, in units for
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


which a 1937 fund was established before May 1, 1977.
(b) A firefighter with twenty (20) years of service is covered by this
chapter and not by IC 36-8-8 if the firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-36.5-7 (repealed September 1,
1981); and
(3) is rehired after April 30, 1977, by the same employer.
(c) A firefighter is covered by this chapter and not by IC 36-8-8 if
the firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-36.5-7 (repealed September 1,
1981);
(3) was rehired after April 30, 1977, but before February 1, 1979;
and
(4) was made, before February 1, 1979, a member of a 1937 fund.
(d) A firefighter who:
(1) is covered by this chapter before a consolidation under
IC 36-3-1-6.1; and
(2) becomes a member of a fire department of a consolidated city
under IC 36-3-1-6.1;
is covered by this chapter after the effective date of the consolidation,
and the firefighter's service as a member of a fire department of a
consolidated city is considered active service under this chapter.
(e) A firefighter who:
(1) as of the date on which fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred to the county fire and
emergency service district under IC 36-8.1-5 is a member of
the 1937 fund as a firefighter with a township fire
department, fire protection territory, or fire protection
district within a county; and
(2) after the transfer of fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities to the county fire and emergency service
district under IC 36-8.1-5 and IC 36-8.1-6 becomes a member
of the county fire department;
is covered by this chapter after the firefighter becomes a member
of the county fire department, and the firefighter's service as a
member of a township fire department, fire protection territory, or
fire protection district that was covered under this chapter before
the transfer of fire protection responsibilities to the county fire and
emergency service district is considered active service under this
chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 36-8-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2024,
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to:
(1) full-time police officers hired or rehired after April 30, 1977,
in all municipalities, or who converted their benefits under
IC 19-1-17.8-7 (repealed September 1, 1981);
(2) full-time fully paid firefighters hired or rehired after April 30,
1977, or who converted their benefits under IC 19-1-36.5-7
(repealed September 1, 1981);
(3) a police matron hired or rehired after April 30, 1977, and
before July 1, 1996, who is a member of a police department in a
second or third class city on March 31, 1996;
(4) a park ranger who:
(A) completed at least the number of weeks of training at the
Indiana law enforcement academy or a comparable law
enforcement academy in another state that were required at the
time the park ranger attended the Indiana law enforcement
academy or the law enforcement academy in another state;
(B) graduated from the Indiana law enforcement academy or
a comparable law enforcement academy in another state; and
(C) is employed by the parks department of a city having a
population of more than one hundred ten thousand (110,000)
and less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000);
(5) a full-time fully paid firefighter who is covered by this chapter
before the effective date of consolidation and becomes a member
of the fire department of a consolidated city under IC 36-3-1-6.1,
provided that the firefighter's service as a member of the fire
department of a consolidated city is considered active service
under this chapter;
(6) except as otherwise provided, a full-time fully paid firefighter
who is hired or rehired after the effective date of the consolidation
by a consolidated fire department established under
IC 36-3-1-6.1;
(7) a full-time police officer who is covered by this chapter before
the effective date of consolidation and becomes a member of the
consolidated law enforcement department as part of the
consolidation under IC 36-3-1-5.1, provided that the officer's
service as a member of the consolidated law enforcement
department is considered active service under this chapter;
(8) except as otherwise provided, a full-time police officer who is
hired or rehired after the effective date of the consolidation by a
consolidated law enforcement department established under
IC 36-3-1-5.1;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(9) a veteran described in IC 36-8-4.7;
(10) a full-time police officer or full-time fully paid firefighter
who is employed by an airport authority; and
(11) a full-time school resource officer; and
(12) a full-time fully paid firefighter who:
(A) as of the date on which fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred to the county fire
and emergency service district under IC 36-8.1-5 is a
member of the 1977 fund as a firefighter with a township
fire department, fire protection territory, or fire protection
district within a county; and
(B) after the transfer of fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities to the county fire and emergency
service district under IC 36-8.1-5 and IC 36-8.1-6 becomes
a member of the county fire department;
except as provided by section 7 of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 36-8-8-2.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) As used in this chapter, "local board"
means the following:
(1) For a unit that established a 1925 fund for its police officers,
the local board described in IC 36-8-6-2.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), for a unit that
established a 1937 fund for its firefighters, the local board
described in IC 36-8-7-3.
(3) This subdivision does not apply to a township in a county
having a consolidated city. For a township that established a
1937 fund for its firefighters and transfers fire protection and
emergency services responsibilities to the county fire and
emergency service district board, the local board of the
county.
(3) (4) For a consolidated city that established a 1953 fund for its
police officers, the local board described in IC 36-8-7.5-2.
(4) (5) For a unit, other than a consolidated city, that did not
establish a 1925 fund for its police officers or a 1937 fund for its
firefighters, the local board described in subsection (b) or (c).
(5) (6) For an airport authority, the board of an airport authority.
(6) (7) For a school resource officer, the local board described in
subdivisions (1) through (4) (5) that manages the fund established
in the unit or the consolidated city in which the:
(A) territory of the school corporation; or
(B) charter school;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


is located. However, if more than one (1) local board is applicable
under this subdivision, the governing body of the school
corporation or the equivalent authority for the charter school that
employs or contracts to employ the school resource officer may
choose the applicable local board with respect to the school
resource officer.
(b) If a unit did not establish a 1925 fund for its police officers, a
local board shall be composed in the same manner described in
IC 36-8-6-2(b). However, if there is not a retired member of the
department, no one shall be appointed to that position until such time
as there is a retired member.
(c) If a unit did not establish a 1937 fund for its firefighters, a local
board shall be composed in the same manner described in
IC 36-8-7-3(b). However, if there is not a retired member of the
department, no one shall be appointed to that position until such time
as there is a retired member.
SECTION 11. IC 36-8-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.102-2023,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to IC 36-8-4.7 and except as
provided in subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (k), (l), and (m), (n), a
police officer or a firefighter who:
(1) is less than forty (40) years of age; and
(2) passes the baseline statewide physical and mental
examinations required under section 19 of this chapter;
shall be a member of the 1977 fund and is not a member of the 1925
fund, the 1937 fund, or the 1953 fund.
(b) A police officer or firefighter with service before May 1, 1977,
who is hired or rehired after April 30, 1977, may receive credit under
this chapter for service as a police officer or firefighter prior to entry
into the 1977 fund if the employer who rehires the police officer or
firefighter chooses to contribute to the 1977 fund the amount necessary
to amortize the police officer's or firefighter's prior service liability over
a period of not more than thirty (30) years, the amount and the period
to be determined by the system board. If the employer chooses to make
the contributions, the police officer or firefighter is entitled to receive
credit for the police officer's or firefighter's prior years of service
without making contributions to the 1977 fund for that prior service. In
no event may a police officer or firefighter receive credit for prior years
of service if the police officer or firefighter is receiving a benefit or is
entitled to receive a benefit in the future from any other public pension
plan with respect to the prior years of service.
(c) Except as provided in section 18 of this chapter, a police officer
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


or firefighter is entitled to credit for all years of service after April 30,
1977, with the police or fire department of an employer covered by this
chapter.
(d) A police officer or firefighter with twenty (20) years of service
does not become a member of the 1977 fund and is not covered by this
chapter, if the police officer or firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981); and
(3) is rehired after April 30, 1977, by the same employer.
(e) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the police officer or
firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981);
(3) was rehired after April 30, 1977, but before February 1, 1979;
and
(4) was made, before February 1, 1979, a member of a 1925,
1937, or 1953 fund.
(f) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the police officer or
firefighter:
(1) was hired by the police or fire department of a unit before May
1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981);
(3) is rehired by the police or fire department of another unit after
December 31, 1981; and
(4) is made, by the fiscal body of the other unit after December
31, 1981, a member of a 1925, 1937, or 1953 fund of the other
unit.
If the police officer or firefighter is made a member of a 1925, 1937, or
1953 fund, the police officer or firefighter is entitled to receive credit
for all the police officer's or firefighter's years of service, including
years before January 1, 1982.
(g) As used in this subsection, "emergency medical services" and
"emergency medical technician" have the meanings set forth in
IC 16-18-2-110 and IC 16-18-2-112. A firefighter who:
(1) is employed by a unit that is participating in the 1977 fund;
(2) was employed as an emergency medical technician by a
political subdivision wholly or partially within the department's
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


jurisdiction;
(3) was a member of the public employees' retirement fund during
the employment described in subdivision (2); and
(4) ceased employment with the political subdivision and was
hired by the unit's fire department due to the reorganization of
emergency medical services within the department's jurisdiction;
shall participate in the 1977 fund. A firefighter who participates in the
1977 fund under this subsection is subject to sections 18 and 21 of this
chapter.
(h) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the individual was
appointed as:
(1) a fire chief under a waiver under IC 36-8-4-6(c); or
(2) a police chief under a waiver under IC 36-8-4-6.5(c);
unless the executive of the unit requests that the 1977 fund accept the
individual in the 1977 fund and the individual previously was a
member of the 1977 fund.
(i) A police matron hired or rehired after April 30, 1977, and before
July 1, 1996, who is a member of a police department in a second or
third class city on March 31, 1996, is a member of the 1977 fund.
(j) A park ranger who:
(1) completed at least the number of weeks of training at the
Indiana law enforcement academy or a comparable law
enforcement academy in another state that were required at the
time the park ranger attended the Indiana law enforcement
academy or the law enforcement academy in another state;
(2) graduated from the Indiana law enforcement academy or a
comparable law enforcement academy in another state; and
(3) is employed by the parks department of a city having a
population of more than one hundred ten thousand (110,000) and
less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000);
is a member of the fund.
(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a police
officer or firefighter:
(1) who is a member of the 1977 fund before a consolidation
under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1;
(2) whose employer is consolidated into the consolidated law
enforcement department or the fire department of a consolidated
city under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1; and
(3) who, after the consolidation, becomes an employee of the
consolidated law enforcement department or the consolidated fire
department under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting the requirements under
sections 19 and 21 of this chapter.
(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if:
(1) before a consolidation under IC 8-22-3-11.6, a police officer
or firefighter provides law enforcement services or fire protection
services for an entity in a consolidated city;
(2) the provision of those services is consolidated into the law
enforcement department or fire department of a consolidated city;
and
(3) after the consolidation, the police officer or firefighter
becomes an employee of the consolidated law enforcement
department or the consolidated fire department under
IC 8-22-3-11.6;
the police officer or firefighter is a member of the 1977 fund without
meeting the requirements under sections 19 and 21 of this chapter.
(m) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
firefighter who:
(1) as of the date on which fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred to the county fire and
emergency service district is a member of the 1977 fund as a
firefighter with a township fire department, fire protection
territory, or fire protection district within a county; and
(2) after the transfer of fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities to the county fire and emergency service
district becomes a member of the county fire department;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting the requirements
under sections 19 and 21 of this chapter. A firefighter described in
this subsection is entitled to receive credit for all years of service as
a member of the 1977 fund before becoming a member of the
county fire department.
(m) (n) A police officer or firefighter who is a member of the 1977
fund under subsection (k) or (l) may not be:
(1) retired for purposes of section 10 of this chapter; or
(2) disabled for purposes of section 12 of this chapter;
solely because of a change in employer under the consolidation.
(n) (o) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and
subject to subsection (o), (p), a police officer or firefighter who:
(1) is an active member of the 1977 fund with an employer that
participates in the 1977 fund;
(2) separates from that employer; and
(3) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of
the separation described in subdivision (2), becomes employed as
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


a full-time police officer or firefighter with the same or a second
employer that participates in the 1977 fund;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting for a second time the
age limitation under subsection (a) and the requirements under sections
19 and 21 of this chapter. A police officer or firefighter to whom this
subsection applies is entitled to receive credit for all years of 1977 fund
covered service as a police officer or firefighter with all employers that
participate in the 1977 fund.
(o) (p) The one hundred eighty (180) day limitation described in
subsection (n)(3) (o)(3) does not apply to a member of the 1977 fund
who is eligible for reinstatement under IC 36-8-4-11.
(p) (q) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
veteran who is:
(1) described in IC 36-8-4.7; and
(2) employed as a firefighter or police officer;
is a member of the 1977 fund.
(q) (r) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and
except as provided in subsection (o), (p), a police officer or firefighter
who:
(1) is an active member of the 1977 fund with an employer that
participates in the 1977 fund;
(2) separates from that employer; and
(3) more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of the
separation described in subdivision (2), becomes employed as a
full-time police officer or firefighter with the same or a second
employer that participates in the 1977 fund;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting the age limitation under
subsection (a) provided the member can accrue twenty (20) years of
service credit in the 1977 fund by the time the firefighter becomes sixty
(60) years of age. A police officer or firefighter who participates in the
1977 fund under this subsection must pass the baseline statewide
physical and mental examination under section 19 of this chapter. A
police officer or firefighter to whom this subsection applies is entitled
to receive credit for all years of 1977 fund covered service as a police
officer or firefighter with all employers that participate in the 1977
fund.
SECTION 12. IC 36-8-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2021,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Each fund member shall contribute during
the period of the fund member's employment or for thirty-two (32)
years, whichever is shorter, an amount equal to six percent (6%) of the
salary of a first class patrolman or firefighter. However, the employer
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


may pay all or a part of the contribution for the member. The amount
of the contribution, other than contributions paid on behalf of a
member, shall be deducted each pay period from each fund member's
salary by the disbursing officer of the employer. The employer shall
send to the system board each year on March 31, June 30, September
30, and December 31, for the calendar quarters ending on those dates,
or an alternate date established by the rules of the system board, a
certified list of fund members and a warrant issued by the employer for
the total amount deducted for fund members' contributions.
(b) After December 31, 2011, an employer shall submit:
(1) the list described in subsection (a) in a uniform format through
a secure connection over the Internet or through other electronic
means specified by the system board; and
(2) the contributions paid by or on behalf of a member under
subsection (a) by electronic funds transfer.
(c) Except as provided in section 7(n) 7(o) or 7.2 of this chapter, if
a fund member ends the fund member's employment other than by
death or disability before the fund member completes twenty (20) years
of active service, the system board shall return to the fund member in
a lump sum the fund member's contributions plus interest at a rate
specified by rule by the system board. If the fund member returns to
service, the fund member is entitled to credit for the years of service for
which the fund member's contributions were refunded if the fund
member repays the amount refunded to the fund member plus interest
at a rate specified by rule by the system board in either a lump sum or
a series of payments determined by the system board.
SECTION 13. IC 36-8-11-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A county legislative body may establish fire
protection districts for any of the following purposes:
(1) Fire protection, including the capability for extinguishing all
fires that might be reasonably expected because of the types of
improvements, personal property, and real property within the
boundaries of the district.
(2) Fire prevention, including identification and elimination of all
potential and actual sources of fire hazard.
(3) If the county legislative body establishes a fire protection
district for either or both of the purposes under subdivision (1) or
(2), in addition to those the fire protection district purposes may
include the provision of emergency medical services (regulated
under IC 16-31-3), basic life support, or advanced life support.
However, this subdivision may not apply, and the purposes under
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


this subdivision may not be included with regard to the fire
protection district, if another local unit or organization is
providing the services under this subdivision with public funds to
the area served by the fire protection district.
(4) If the county legislative body establishes a fire protection
district for either or both of the purposes under subdivision (1) or
(2), in addition to those the fire protection district purposes may
include the prevention of hazards that may cause loss of life,
injury or other health impacts, property damage, loss of
livelihoods and services, social and economic disruption, or
environmental damage.
(5) Other purposes or functions related to fire protection and fire
prevention.
(b) Any area may be established as a fire protection district, but one
(1) part of a district may not be completely separate from another part.
A municipality may be included in a district, but only if it consents by
ordinance, unless a majority of the freeholders of the municipality have
petitioned to be included in the district.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the territory of a district
may consist of:
(1) one (1) or more townships and parts of one (1) or more
townships in the same county; or
(2) all of the townships in the same county.
The boundaries of a district need not coincide with those of other
political subdivisions.
(d) The territory of a district may consist of a municipality that is
located in more than one (1) county.
(e) As of the date on which fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred to a county fire and
emergency service district under IC 36-8.1-5 the following occur in
the county fire and emergency service district:
(1) Subject to subdivision (2), the county fire and emergency
service district assumes the powers, duties, rights,
responsibilities, and obligations under this chapter of each
township participating in the district.
(2) The county fire and emergency service district may
withdraw any part of the unincorporated area of the county
from participation in the fire protection district, as specified
in the county fire and emergency services plan.
(3) The department of local government finance shall make
any necessary adjustments to the maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy for the county for any transfer of
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


powers, duties, rights, responsibilities, and obligations under
this section.
SECTION 14. IC 36-8-11-12.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 198, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) This section applies only
to a county for which a fire protection district includes:
(1) all of the incorporated and unincorporated area of the county;
or
(2) all of the unincorporated area of the county.
(b) The county legislative body may adopt an ordinance to establish
a nine (9) member governing board for the fire protection district. The
ordinance must provide that the governing board consists of the
following:
(1) Eight (8) governing board members appointed by the county
legislative body who meet the following requirements:
(A) Each governing board member must be an active member
of the board of fire trustees at the time of appointment to the
governing board. Upon appointment to the governing board,
the individual ceases to be a member of the board of fire
trustees.
(B) Two (2) governing board members must reside in each of
the following four (4) geographic areas of the county that
contain as nearly as possible, equal area in square miles:
(i) Northwest.
(ii) Northeast.
(iii) Southwest.
(iv) Southeast.
(2) One (1) governing board member who is a member of the
county executive and serves on the board by virtue of their office.
Notwithstanding section 14(c) of this chapter, the member may
not receive any compensation for serving on the governing board
but may be compensated for expenses.
(c) Beginning on the date specified in the ordinance establishing the
governing board, the following occurs:
(1) Only the governing board shall have the powers and duties of
a board of fire trustees that are set forth in section 15 of this
chapter or in any other statute. Unless expressly provided
otherwise, any reference in this chapter or other statute to a board
of fire trustees or a member of the board of fire trustees is a
reference to the governing board or a member of the governing
board.
(2) The board of fire trustees:
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(A) continues in existence solely as an advisory body to the
governing board; and
(B) does not have any of the powers and duties of a board of
fire trustees that are set forth in section 15 of this chapter or in
any other statute.
Sections 12, 13, and 14 of this chapter continue to apply to the
administration of the board of fire trustees.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), the term of a member
appointed to the governing board is four (4) years. The terms expire on
the first Monday of January of the year their appointments expire.
(e) The county legislative body may provide, in the ordinance
establishing the governing board, for the staggering of the terms of the
original governing board members appointed under subsection (b)(1).
(f) If a vacancy occurs on the governing board, the county
legislative body shall appoint a member with the qualifications set forth
in this section for the unexpired term.
SECTION 15. IC 36-8-11-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 199, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The board:
(1) has the same powers and duties as a township executive with
respect to fire protection functions, including those duties and
powers prescribed by IC 36-8-13 and after December 31, 2027,
IC 36-8.1-6, although all cooperative and joint actions permitted
by that chapter IC 36-8-13 and IC 36-8.1-6 must be undertaken
according to this chapter;
(2) has the same powers and duties as a township executive
relative to contracting with volunteer firefighting companies, as
prescribed by IC 36-8-12, and IC 36-8-13, and after December
31, 2027, IC 36-8.1-6;
(3) shall appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the duties
of a fiscal officer, secretarial staff, persons performing special and
temporary services or providing legal counsel, and other
personnel considered necessary for the proper functioning of the
district; however, a person appointed as fiscal officer must be
bonded by good and sufficient sureties in an amount ordered by
the county legislative body to protect the district from financial
loss;
(4) shall exercise general supervision of and make regulations for
the administration of the district's affairs;
(5) shall prescribe uniform rules pertaining to investigations and
hearings;
(6) shall supervise the fiscal affairs and responsibilities of the
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


district;
(7) may delegate to employees of the district the authority to
perform ministerial acts, except in cases in which final action of
the board is necessary;
(8) shall keep accurate and complete records of all departmental
proceedings, record and file all bonds and contracts, and assume
responsibility for the custody and preservation of all papers and
documents of the district;
(9) shall make an annual report to the executive and the fiscal
body of the county that at least lists the financial transactions of
the district and a statement of the progress in accomplishing the
purposes for which the district has been established;
(10) shall adopt a seal and certify all official acts;
(11) may sue and be sued collectively by its legal name:
(A) ("Board of Fire Trustees, __________ Fire Protection
District"); or
(B) ("Governing Board of __________ Fire Protection
District"), if a governing board for the district is appointed
under section 12.5 of this chapter;
with service of process made on the chair of the board, but costs
may not be taxed against the members individually in an action;
(12) may invoke any legal, equitable, or special remedy for the
enforcement of this chapter or of proper action of the board taken
in a court;
(13) shall prepare and submit to the fiscal body of the county an
annual budget for operation and maintenance expenses and for the
retirement of obligations of the district, subject to review and
approval by the fiscal body;
(14) may, if advisable, establish one (1) or more advisory
committees, however in a county that adopts an ordinance under
section 12.5 of this chapter, the board of fire trustees shall be an
advisory body to the governing board;
(15) may enter into agreements with and accept money from a
federal or state agency and enter into agreements with a
municipality located within or outside the district, whether or not
the municipality is a part of the district, for a purpose compatible
with the purposes for which the district exists and with the
interests of the municipality;
(16) may accept gifts of money or other property to be used for
the purposes for which the district is established;
(17) may levy taxes at a uniform rate on the real and personal
property within the district;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(18) may issue bonds and tax anticipation warrants;
(19) may incur other debts and liabilities;
(20) may purchase or rent property;
(21) may sell services or property that are produced incident to
the operations of the district making a fair and reasonable charge
for it;
(22) may make contracts or otherwise enter into agreements with
public or private persons and federal or state agencies for
construction, maintenance, or operations of or in part of the
district;
(23) may receive and disburse money;
(24) may impose a false alarm fee or service charge under
IC 36-8-13-4 or after December 31, 2027, IC 36-8.1-6-4;
(25) may, subject to the approval of the active members of the fire
department in a referendum, adopt a merit system under
IC 36-8-3.5; and
(26) shall serve as merit commissioners if a merit system is
adopted under IC 36-8-3.5.
(b) Powers granted by this chapter may be used only to accomplish
the purpose or purposes as stated in the ordinance or resolution
establishing the district. However, an act of the board necessary and
proper to accomplish the purposes for which the district is established
is not invalid because it incidentally accomplishes a purpose other than
one for which the district is established.
SECTION 16. IC 36-8-11-19 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. The department of
local government finance, when approving a rate and levy fixed by the
board, shall verify that a duplication of tax levies does not exist
between a fire protection district and a municipality, or township, or
after December 31, 2027, county fire and emergency service
district, in the case of a county not having a consolidated city,
within the boundaries of the district, so that taxpayers do not bear two
(2) levies for the same service, except as provided by section 20 of this
chapter.
SECTION 17. IC 36-8-11-21 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. This chapter does
not require a municipality, or township, or after December 31, 2027,
county fire and emergency service district to disband its fire
department unless its legislative body consents by ordinance.
SECTION 18. IC 36-8-12-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b) and section 10 of this chapter, this chapter
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


applies to all units except counties.
(b) After December 31, 2027:
(1) this chapter also applies to counties; and
(2) the county fire and emergency service district assumes the
powers, duties, rights, and obligations under this chapter of
each township in the county.
SECTION 19. IC 36-8-12.2-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this
chapter, "fire department" means a fire department that:
(1) is established under IC 36-8-2-3, or IC 36-8-13-3(a)(1), or
IC 36-8.1-6; and
(2) employs:
(A) both full-time paid members and volunteer members; or
(B) only full-time paid members.
SECTION 20. IC 36-8-12.2-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Money collected
under this chapter must be deposited in one (1) of the following:
(1) The general fund of the unit that established the fire
department under IC 36-8-2-3, or IC 36-8-13-3(a)(1), or
IC 36-8.1-6.
(2) A hazardous materials response fund established under section
8.1 of this chapter by a city or town having a fire department
established under IC 36-8-2-3.
(b) Money collected under this chapter may be used only for the
following:
(1) Purchase of supplies and equipment used in providing
hazardous materials emergency assistance under this chapter.
(2) Training for members of the fire department in skills
necessary for providing hazardous materials emergency assistance
under this chapter.
(3) Payment to persons with which the fire department contracts
to provide services related to the hazardous materials emergency
assistance provided by the fire department under this chapter.
SECTION 21. IC 36-8-13-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. Notwithstanding anything to
the contrary in this chapter or any other law, a township, excluding
a township in a county containing a consolidated city, may not
impose a property tax levy for fire protection or emergency
services for property taxes first due and payable after December
31, 2027.
SECTION 22. IC 36-8-13-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2005,
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to all townships. However,
this chapter does not apply to a township in which the fire department
of the township has been consolidated under IC 36-3-1-6.1 or that has
transferred fire protection and emergency services responsibilities
to a county fire and emergency service district under IC 36-8.1-5.
SECTION 23. IC 36-8-13-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2024,
SECTION 59, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Each township shall establish either:
(1) a township firefighting and emergency services fund which is
to be used by the township for the payment of costs attributable
to providing fire protection or emergency services under the
methods prescribed in section 3 of this chapter and for no other
purposes; or
(2) two (2) separate funds consisting of:
(A) a township firefighting fund that is to be used by the
township for the payment of costs attributable to providing fire
protection under the methods prescribed in section 3 of this
chapter and for no other purposes; and
(B) a township emergency services fund that is to be used by
the township for the payment of costs attributable to providing
emergency services under the methods prescribed in section 3
of this chapter and for no other purposes.
The money in the funds described in either subdivision (1) or (2) may
be paid out by the township executive with the consent of the township
legislative body.
(b) If a township transitions from a single township firefighting and
emergency services fund under subsection (a)(1) to two (2) separate
funds as allowed under subsection (a)(2), the township legislative body
shall approve a transfer of the remaining cash balance in the township
firefighting and emergency services fund to the two (2) new separate
funds. As part of the transfer under this subsection, the legislative body
shall determine the amounts of the remaining cash balance that will be
attributable to the township firefighting fund and the township
emergency services fund.
(c) Subject to section 0.5 of this chapter, each township may levy,
for each year, a tax for either:
(1) the township firefighting and emergency services fund
described in subsection (a)(1); or
(2) both:
(A) the township firefighting fund; and
(B) the township emergency services fund;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


described in subsection (a)(2).
Other than a township providing fire protection or emergency services
or both to municipalities in the township under section 3(b) or 3(c) of
this chapter, the tax levy is on all taxable real and personal property in
the township outside the corporate boundaries of municipalities.
Subject to the levy limitations contained in IC 6-1.1-18.5, the township
firefighting and emergency services levy is to be in an amount
sufficient to pay costs attributable to fire protection and emergency
services that are not paid from other revenues available to the fund. If
a township establishes a township firefighting fund and a township
emergency services fund described in subdivision (2), the combined
levies are to be an amount sufficient to pay costs attributable to fire
protection and emergency services. However, fire protection services
may be paid only from the township firefighting fund and emergency
services may be paid only from the township emergency services fund,
and each fund may pay costs attributable to the respective fund for
services that are not paid from other revenues available to either
applicable fund. The tax rate and levy for a levy described in this
subsection shall be established in accordance with the procedures set
forth in IC 6-1.1-17.
(d) In addition to the tax levy and service charges received under
IC 36-8-12-13 and IC 36-8-12-16, the executive may accept donations
to the township for the purpose of firefighting and other emergency
services and shall place them in the township firefighting and
emergency services fund established under subsection (a)(1), or if
applicable, the township firefighting fund established under subsection
(a)(2)(A) if the purpose of the donation is for firefighting, or in the
township emergency services fund established under subsection
(a)(2)(B) if the purpose of the donation is for emergency services,
keeping an accurate record of the sums received. A person may also
donate partial payment of any purchase of firefighting or other
emergency services equipment made by the township.
(e) If a fire department serving a township dispatches fire apparatus
or personnel to a building or premises in the township in response to:
(1) an alarm caused by improper installation or improper
maintenance; or
(2) a drill or test, if the fire department is not previously notified
that the alarm is a drill or test;
the township may impose a fee or service charge upon the owner of the
property. However, if the owner of property that constitutes the owner's
residence establishes that the alarm is under a maintenance contract
with an alarm company and that the alarm company has been notified
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


of the improper installation or maintenance of the alarm, the alarm
company is liable for the payment of the fee or service charge.
(f) The amount of a fee or service charge imposed under subsection
(e) shall be determined by the township legislative body. All money
received by the township from the fee or service charge must be
deposited in the township's firefighting and emergency services fund
or the township's firefighting fund.
SECTION 24. IC 36-8-14-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this
section, "emergency medical services" has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-18-2-110.
(b) As used in this section, "volunteer fire department" has the
meaning set forth in IC 36-8-12-2.
(c) The legislative body of a unit or the board of fire trustees of a
fire protection district may provide a cumulative building and
equipment fund under IC 6-1.1-41 for the following purposes:
(1) The:
(A) purchase, construction, renovation, or addition to
buildings; or
(B) purchase of land;
used by the fire department or a volunteer fire department serving
the unit.
(2) The purchase of firefighting equipment for use of the fire
department or a volunteer fire department serving the unit,
including making the required payments under a lease rental with
option to purchase agreement made to acquire the equipment.
(3) In a municipality, the purchase of police radio equipment.
(4) The:
(A) purchase, construction, renovation, or addition to a
building;
(B) purchase of land; or
(C) purchase of equipment;
for use of a provider of emergency medical services under
IC 16-31-5 to the unit establishing the fund.
(d) In addition to the requirements of IC 6-1.1-41, before a
cumulative fund may be established by a township fire protection
district, the county legislative body which appoints the trustees of the
fire protection district must approve the establishment of the fund.
(e) This subsection does not apply to a county having a
consolidated city. The following apply if fire protection and
emergency service responsibilities have been transferred from a
township to the county fire and emergency service district under
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


IC 36-8.1-5:
(1) A cumulative building and equipment fund is established
for each county fire and emergency service district. The
adoption and approval provisions of IC 6-1.1-41 do not apply
to the establishment of the fund under this subdivision. The
provisions of IC 6-1.1-41 concerning the adoption of a tax levy
apply to the fund. However, a county fiscal body may, before
a transfer of responsibilities is completed, take any action
required under this chapter that is necessary to provide for
the cumulative building and equipment fund to be established
and to impose the property tax levy under this chapter.
(2) Each cumulative building and equipment fund established
by a township in the county is abolished, and the balance in
the township's cumulative building and equipment fund shall
be transferred to the county fire and emergency service
district's cumulative building and equipment fund established
under subdivision (1).
SECTION 25. IC 36-8-14-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) To provide for
the cumulative building and equipment fund established under this
chapter, the legislative body may levy a tax on all taxable property
within the taxing district in compliance with IC 6-1.1-41. The tax rate
may not exceed three and thirty-three hundredths cents ($0.0333) on
each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of property in
the taxing district.
(b) As the tax is collected, it shall be deposited in a qualified public
depository or depositories and held in a special fund to be known as:
(1) the "building or remodeling, firefighting, and police radio
equipment fund" in the case of a municipality; or as
(2) the "building or remodeling and fire equipment fund" in the
case of a township, after December 31, 2027, a county fire and
emergency service district, in the case of a county not having
a consolidated city, or a fire protection district.
SECTION 26. IC 36-8-19-1.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.3. On January 1, 2028, the
following apply if a township, excluding a township located in a
county containing a consolidated city, is a participating unit in a
fire protection territory as the transfer of fire protection and
emergency service responsibilities from a township to the county
fire and emergency service district under IC 36-8.1-5:
(1) Subject to subdivision (2), on the date on which the
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


transfer is completed, the county fire and emergency service
district shall assume the powers, duties, rights,
responsibilities, and obligations under this chapter previously
held by the township that was a participating unit.
(2) A county fire and emergency service district may
withdraw as otherwise provided in this chapter from the fire
protection territory, as specified in the county fire and
emergency services plan adopted under IC 36-8.1-4.
SECTION 27. IC 36-8.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 8.1. COUNTY FIRE AND EMERGENCY
SERVICES
Chapter 1. Applicability
Sec. 1. This article:
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2), applies to a county
that has at least (1) township that provides fire and
emergency services within that township; and
(2) does not apply to:
(A) a county containing a consolidated city;
(B) a county in which all the territory of the county is
included in a fire protection district established under
IC 36-8-11; or
(C) a county that, on January 1, 2026, has begun to
consolidate fire protection for all of the territory of the
county within a fire protection district established under
IC 36-8-11.
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this article:
(1) "Board" refers to a county fire and emergency services
board established under IC 36-8.1-3-1.
(2) "County plan" means a county fire and emergency
services plan established under IC 36-8.1-4.
(3) "District" refers to a county fire and emergency service
district established under IC 36-8.1-5-1.
Chapter 3. County Fire and Emergency Services Board
Sec. 1. On or before January 1, 2027, each county executive
body shall pass an ordinance establishing a county fire and
emergency services board. The ordinance must include the
composition of the board in accordance with section 2 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) A board consists of the following members:
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(1) Two (2) members appointed by the county executive from
the membership of the county executive.
(2) One (1) member appointed by the county fiscal body from
the membership of the fiscal body.
(3) One (1) member:
(A) who is the executive of the municipality having the
largest population in the county if that municipality is a
city; or
(B) appointed from the membership of the legislative body
of a town if the town is the municipality having the largest
population in the county.
(4) One (1) member of the legislative body of the municipality
with the largest population in the county appointed by the
legislative body of that municipality.
(5) One (1) of the following:
(A) A member who is the executive of a city in the county
that is not the municipality having the largest population
in the county and who is appointed by the executive of the
county to represent the municipalities in the county other
than the municipality having the largest population.
(B) A member who is a member of the legislative body of
a town in the county that is not the municipality having the
largest population in the county and who is appointed by
the executive of the county to represent the municipalities
in the county other than the municipality having the
largest population.
(C) If the county contains only one (1) municipality, a
member who is a freeholder whose freehold is located in
the conservancy district that:
(i) is located entirely within the county; and
(ii) contains the greatest number of freeholds of any
conservancy district located in the county;
and who is appointed to the board by the board of the
conservancy district.
(6) One (1) additional member appointed by the county
executive from the membership of the county executive.
(b) Populations used to determine membership to the board
under subsection (a) are established according to the most recent
decennial census of Indiana.
Sec. 3. (a) The term of office of a member of the board who is
appointed from the membership of an executive, legislative, or
fiscal body under this chapter is coextensive with the member's
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


term of office on that body. The term of office of other appointed
members of the board is two (2) years.
(b) All members of the board serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
Sec. 4. (a) The board shall fix the time for holding regular
meetings, but it shall meet at least once in the months September
and October. The county legislative body may order that regular
meetings be held more frequently.
(b) Special meetings of the board may be called by the chair or
by two (2) board members, upon written request to the secretary.
At least three (3) days before a special meeting, the secretary shall
send to all members of the board a written notice fixing the time
and place of the meeting. Written notice of a special meeting is not
required if:
(1) the time of the special meeting has been fixed in a regular
meeting; or
(2) all trustees were present at a meeting at which a special
meeting was called.
Sec. 5. (a) At the first regular meeting each year, the members
of the board shall elect a chair, vice chair, and secretary from their
number. The vice chair shall act as chair during the absence or
disability of the chair.
(b) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. An action of
the board is official only if it is authorized by a majority of the
board at a regular or properly called special meeting.
Sec. 6. Members of the board who are members of a legislative
or executive body serve as ex officio members of the board and
may not receive compensation for participation on the board. The
member of the board may not cast a vote on any matter concerning
the district as a member of:
(1) the county executive;
(2) the county legislative body; or
(3) the county fiscal body.
Sec. 7. (a) The board shall appoint a county fire chief to
administer the day to day operations of the district.
(b) The county fire chief serves at the pleasure of the board.
Sec. 8. The board:
(1) shall create and maintain a county plan under IC 36-8.1-4;
(2) shall appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the
duties of secretarial staff, persons performing special and
temporary services or providing legal counsel, and other
personnel considered necessary for the proper functioning of
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


the district;
(3) shall exercise general supervision of and make regulations
for the administration of the district's affairs;
(4) shall prescribe uniform rules pertaining to investigations
and hearings;
(5) shall supervise the fiscal affairs and responsibilities of the
district;
(6) may delegate to employees of the district the authority to
perform ministerial acts, except in cases in which final action
of the board is necessary;
(7) shall keep accurate and complete records of all
departmental proceedings, record and file all bonds and
contracts, and assume responsibility for the custody and
preservation of all papers and documents of the district;
(8) shall make an annual report to the executive and the fiscal
body of the county that at least lists the financial transactions
of the district and a statement of the progress in
accomplishing the purposes for which the district has been
established;
(9) shall adopt a seal and certify all official acts;
(10) may sue and be sued under the name of " __________
County Fire and Emergency Services Board", with service of
process made on the chair of the board, but costs may not be
taxed against the members individually in an action;
(11) may invoke any legal, equitable, or special remedy for the
enforcement of this chapter or of proper action of the board
taken in a court;
(12) shall prepare and submit an annual budget in the same
manner as an executive department for the county for
operation and maintenance expenses and for the retirement
of obligations of the district;
(13) may enter into agreements with and accept money from
a federal or state agency and enter into agreements with a
municipality located within or outside the district, whether or
not the municipality is a part of the district, for a purpose
compatible with the purposes for which the district exists and
with the interests of the municipality;
(14) may accept gifts of money or other property to be used
for the purposes for which the district is established;
(15) with approval of the county executive, may issue bonds
and tax anticipation warrants;
(16) may incur other debts and liabilities;
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(17) may purchase or rent property;
(18) may sell services or property that are produced incident
to the operations of the district making a fair and reasonable
charge for it;
(19) may make contracts or otherwise enter into agreements
with public or private persons and federal or state agencies
for construction, maintenance, or operations of or in part of
the district;
(20) may receive and disburse money;
(21) may impose a false alarm fee or service charge under
IC 36-8.1-6-4;
(22) has the same powers and duties as a township executive
relative to contracting with volunteer firefighting companies,
as prescribed by IC 36-8-12 and IC 36-8-13;
(23) may, subject to the approval of the active members of the
fire department in a referendum, adopt a merit system under
IC 36-8-3.5;
(24) shall serve as merit commissioners if a merit system is
adopted under IC 36-8-3.5;
(25) shall purchase firefighting and emergency services
apparatus and equipment for the district, provide for the
housing, care, maintenance, operation, and use of the
apparatus and equipment to provide services within the
district;
(26) shall contract in accordance with IC 36-1-7 and this
section with a municipality in the county or in a contiguous
county that maintains adequate firefighting or emergency
services apparatus and equipment to provide fire protection
or emergency services;
(27) shall cooperate in accordance with IC 36-1-7 and this
section with a municipality in the county or in a contiguous
county in the purchase, maintenance, and upkeep of
firefighting or emergency services apparatus and equipment
for use in the municipality and county;
(28) may contract with a volunteer fire department for the use
and operation of firefighting apparatus and equipment that
have been purchased by the volunteer fire department in
order to save the private and public property of the county
from destruction by fire, including use of the apparatus and
equipment in an adjoining county by the volunteer fire
department if the volunteer fire department has made a
contract with the executive of the adjoining county to furnish
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


firefighting service within the county;
(29) may contract with a volunteer fire department that
maintains adequate firefighting service in accordance with
IC 36-1-7, IC 36-8-12, and this section; and
(30) may use money in the county's rainy day fund to pay
costs attributable to providing fire protection or emergency
services consistent with the county plan.
Sec. 9. With the approval of the county executive body, bonds
may be issued only against the taxable property of a district and
may be paid in part by revenues derived from reasonable charges
for services or property produced incident to the operation of the
district.
Sec. 10. The board shall submit an annual budget in the same
manner as other executive departments of the county.
Sec. 11. The department of local government finance, when
approving a rate and levy fixed by the county, shall verify that a
duplication of tax levies does not exist between a district and a
political subdivision within the boundaries of the district, so that
taxpayers do not bear two (2) levies for the same service, except as
provided by IC 36-8.1-5-6.
Sec. 12. In the event municipal fire and emergency fire
protection change to the district under a county plan, the
department of local government finance shall adjust the county's
and each municipality's maximum permissible ad valorem
property tax levy in the year following the year in which the
change occurs, as determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3.
Chapter 4. County Fire and Emergency Services Plan
Sec. 1. On or before July 1, 2027, the board shall develop and
propose a county fire and emergency services plan. After the board
proposes a county plan, the county legislative body shall review the
county plan during at least two (2) public meetings at which the
public and any interested parties shall have the opportunity to
comment on the county plan.
Sec. 2. (a) A county legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
finally approving the county plan.
(b) If a county legislative body does not adopt an ordinance
finally approving a county plan under subsection (a) before August
15, 2027, the county plan prepared by the board shall be
considered the county plan.
(c) The county fire chief is the administrator of the county plan
and is responsible for the day to day operations. All contracts and
bids must be approved by the board.
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


Sec. 3. A county legislative body may periodically amend the
ordinance setting forth the county plan.
Sec. 4. (a) A county plan must provide that after the transfer of
fire protection and emergency services responsibilities to the
district under IC 36-8.1-5, the district is responsible for fire
protection and emergency services.
(b) A county plan must include the following:
(1) A comprehensive plan providing for fire protection,
emergency medical services, and hazardous materials
response in the county in an efficient and cost effective
manner. The comprehensive plan must describe the facilities,
equipment, and personnel that will be used to provide fire
protection and emergency services in the county.
(2) A description of the standards of service and protocols for
fire protection and emergency services.
(3) A plan specifying the transition of fire protection and
emergency services from existing township fire departments
and other providers of fire protection and emergency services
to district administered fire protection and emergency
services.
(4) A description of:
(A) the organization of the county fire department; and
(B) any residency requirements that apply to members of
the county fire department.
(5) A description of any fire protection districts, fire
protection territories, volunteer fire departments, or other
units of government that will be established or used to provide
fire protection services or with which the county will contract
or otherwise enter into an agreement for fire protection and
emergency services. The county plan must provide that the
board will provide for fire protection and emergency services
in the county through any combination of the following:
(A) The operation of a county fire department.
(B) Contracting with or otherwise cooperating with any
municipality, county, fire protection district, volunteer fire
department, fire protection territory, or other entity.
(c) The county plan may authorize a municipality or volunteer
fire department to provide fire protection and emergency services
to an unincorporated area of the county, if the municipality or
volunteer fire department and board enter into an interlocal
cooperation agreement under IC 36-1-7.
Chapter 5. County Fire and Emergency Services Duties
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


Sec. 1. Beginning January 1, 2028:
(1) a county fire and emergency services district is established
in each county;
(2) the powers and duties of township government and the
township trustee related to providing fire protection and
emergency services in the unincorporated areas of the county
shall be transferred to the district;
(3) the powers and duties of a political subdivision related to
providing fire protection and emergency services may be
transferred to the district in accordance with the county plan
adopted under IC 36-8.1-4; and
(4) following a transfer described in subdivision (1), the
district assumes responsibility for providing fire protection
and emergency services in the areas described in subdivisions
(2) and (3).
Sec. 2. Fire protection and emergency services responsibilities
that are transferred to the district under this chapter are governed
by and subject to a county plan adopted under IC 36-8.1-4 and
subject to the procedures in IC 36-8.1-6.
Sec. 3. The district shall, as provided in the county plan adopted
under IC 36-8.1-4, provide for fire protection and emergency
services in the county that are transferred to the district under this
chapter through any combination of:
(1) operating a county fire department;
(2) contracting with or otherwise cooperating with any
municipality, county, fire protection district, volunteer fire
department, fire protection territory, or other entity; or
(3) entering into mutual aid agreements.
Sec. 4. (a) If fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities are transferred to the district under this chapter,
on the date on which the transfer is completed, all:
(1) assets;
(2) debts;
(3) property rights;
(4) equipment;
(5) records;
(6) personnel; and
(7) contracts;
connected with the operations of providing fire protection and
emergency services are transferred to the district.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(6), the district shall
determine which, if any, transferring township employees who
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


were employed by the township to perform fire protection and
emergency services and who were transferred to the district under
this chapter become county employees responsible for performing
fire protection and emergency services functions that were
transferred to the district under this chapter.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), if fire protection
and emergency services responsibilities are transferred to the
district under this chapter, on the date on which the transfer is
completed, the balance in a debt service fund related to fire
protection of a township located in the county:
(1) is transferred to the district in the county in which the
township is located; and
(2) shall be used by the district to pay indebtedness or lease
rentals for which the fund was established.
Any balance remaining in the fund after all payments for
indebtedness or lease rentals required under this section have been
made is transferred to the appropriate district fund for fire
protection within the county.
(b) If fire protection and emergency services responsibilities are
transferred to the district under this chapter, on the date on which
the transfer is completed, the balance in a debt service fund related
to fire protection of a township that is wholly contained within a
fire protection district as of December 31 of the immediately
preceding calendar year:
(1) is transferred to the district in the county in which the
township is wholly contained; and
(2) shall be used by the district to pay indebtedness or lease
rentals for which the fund was established.
Any balance remaining in the fund after all payments for
indebtedness or lease rentals required under this section have been
satisfied in full is transferred to the appropriate district fund for
fire protection within the county.
Sec. 6. If fire protection and emergency services responsibilities
are transferred to the district under this chapter, indebtedness that
was incurred by a political subdivision before the transfer:
(1) may not be imposed on taxpayers that were not
responsible for payment of the indebtedness before the
transfer; and
(2) must be paid by the taxpayers that were responsible for
payment of the indebtedness before the transfer.
Sec. 7. The department of local government finance shall adjust
maximum permissible property tax levies and property tax rates
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


of units of local government as necessary to account for transfers
of duties, powers, and obligations under this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) If fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities are transferred to the district under this chapter,
on the date on which the transfer is completed, fire protection and
emergency services of a district are governed by and subject to a
county plan adopted under IC 36-8.1-4.
(b) If, as of the transfer of fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities, a political subdivision has a local board
for the 1937 firefighters' pension fund or the 1977 police officers'
and firefighters' pension and disability fund, the local board is
dissolved on the date on which the fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred under this chapter, and the
powers, duties, and responsibilities of the local board under
IC 36-8-7 or IC 36-8-8, respectively, are assumed by the board's
local board for the 1937 firefighters' pension fund and local board
for the 1977 police officers' and firefighters' pension and disability
fund, respectively. Notwithstanding any other provision, the
legislative body of the county may adopt an ordinance to adjust the
membership of the county's local board to reflect the dissolution of
the township's local board.
(c) If fire protection and emergency services responsibilities are
transferred to the district under this chapter, a county shall levy
taxes as necessary to provide for the payment of pension benefits:
(1) to members of the 1937 firefighters' pension fund; and
(2) for which, before the transfer of fire protection
responsibilities to the district under this chapter, the local
board of a political subdivision in the county was responsible.
Sec. 9. (a) If fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities are transferred to the district under this chapter,
on the date on which the transfer is completed, the district shall
assume, defease, pay, or refund all township indebtedness or lease
rental obligations related to a power or duty transferred to the
district. The county legislative body may levy property taxes to pay
township indebtedness or lease rental obligations incurred by a
township only in the geographic area of the township that
originally issued the debt or entered into the lease rental agreement
and transfer the revenue to the district. The former territory of the
township comprises a taxing district for the payment of township
indebtedness or lease rental obligations existing at the time of the
abolition or alteration. A levy under this subsection is excluded
from the county's maximum permissible tax levy calculated under
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


IC 6-18.5-3.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, to assume, defease, pay, or
refund all or a part of the indebtedness or lease rental obligations
described in subsection (a), the board is not required to comply
with any other statutory procedures or approvals that apply when
a unit incurs indebtedness or lease rental obligations.
(c) The rights of a trustee, bondholder, or leaseholder with
respect to any:
(1) indebtedness or lease rental obligations described in
subsection (a); or
(2) bond resolution, trust agreement or indenture, security
agreement, purchase agreement, or other undertaking with
respect to indebtedness described in subsection (a);
remain the same, although the powers, duties, agreements, and
liabilities of the townships have been transferred to the county
emergency management agency, and the district shall be
considered to have assumed all those powers, duties, agreements,
and liabilities.
Sec. 10. Subject to section 11 of this chapter, a county or
municipal executive, county or municipal fiscal body, and board
may adopt appropriate measures, including ordinances and
resolutions, necessary to accomplish a transition in the county from
township or municipal government to assumption of the powers,
functions, and duties of township or municipal government by the
county government.
Sec. 11. A measure adopted under section 10 of this chapter may
not be inconsistent with any law.
Sec. 12. (a) A district shall maintain a county fire protection and
emergency services advisory council for the purpose of receiving
recommendations and advice concerning the provision of fire
protection and emergency services in the county.
(b) The county fire protection and emergency services advisory
council consists of the following individuals or their designees:
(1) The director of the county emergency management
agency.
(2) The county fire chief.
(3) One (1) individual from each township that has
transferred fire protection and emergency services
responsibilities to the district. An individual appointed under
this subdivision must reside in the township and be appointed
to the county fire protection and emergency services advisory
council by the township trustee.
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(c) The county fire protection and emergency services advisory
council shall make recommendations concerning the provision of
fire protection and emergency services in the county.
Chapter 6. County Fire Protection and Emergency Services
Sec. 1. This chapter applies if fire protection and emergency
services responsibilities are transferred from a township to the
district under IC 36-8.1-5.
Sec. 2. (a) After December 31, 2027, if fire protection and
emergency services responsibilities are transferred from a
township to the district under IC 36-8.1-5, the district shall provide
for fire protection and emergency services in the unincorporated
areas of the county in the manner specified in the county plan.
(b) As provided in IC 36-8.1-5, in carrying out fire protection
and emergency services responsibilities, the district shall, as
provided in the county plan, provide for fire protection and
emergency services in the county.
(c) A municipality may provide fire protection and emergency
services to an unincorporated area of the county, if the
municipality and district enter into an interlocal cooperation
agreement under IC 36-1-7. The agreement must be in writing and
clearly define the boundaries of the area in which the municipality
will provide fire protection services or emergency services, or both.
Notwithstanding any other law, the municipality may not assess
any additional charges or fees for service to recipients for
providing the services to the area.
(d) The district may provide fire protection or emergency
services, or both, inside the corporate boundaries of a municipality
whose municipal territory is completely within a county and that
does not have a full-time paid fire department. In the event the
district provides fire or emergency services inside the corporate
boundaries of a municipality, the district may charge insurance
companies of an individual that received emergency medical
services provided by the district.
Sec. 3. (a) The county fire chief, consistent with the county plan,
shall do the following in carrying out the district's responsibility to
provide fire protection and emergency services in the district after
a transfer of responsibilities:
(1) Employ full-time or part-time personnel to operate the
apparatus and equipment and to provide services in the
district.
(2) Give preference in employment under this section
according to the following priority:
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(A) A war veteran who has been discharged from the
armed forces of the United States under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
(B) A person whose mother or father was a:
(i) firefighter of a unit;
(ii) municipal police officer; or
(iii) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
A person described in this subdivision may not receive a
preference for employment unless the person applies for
employment and meets all employment requirements
prescribed by law, including physical and age requirements,
and all employment requirements prescribed by the fire
department.
(b) The county fire chief shall be responsible for the day to day
operations in administering the county plan.
Sec. 4. (a) If a district fire department dispatches fire apparatus
or personnel to a building or premises in the county in response to:
(1) an alarm caused by improper installation or improper
maintenance; or
(2) a drill or test, if the fire department is not previously
notified that the alarm is a drill or test;
the district may impose a fee or service charge upon the owner of
the property. However, if the owner of property that constitutes
the owner's residence establishes that the alarm is under a
maintenance contract with an alarm company and that the alarm
company has been notified of the improper installation or
maintenance of the alarm, the alarm company is liable for the
payment of the fee or service charge.
(b) The amount of a fee or service charge imposed under
subsection (a) shall be determined by the board. All money
received by the district from the fee or service charge must be
deposited in a fund prescribed by the board.
Sec. 5. After a sufficient appropriation has been made and
approved and is available for the purchase of firefighting
apparatus and equipment, including housing, the board may
purchase firefighting apparatus and equipment for the district on
an installment conditional sale or mortgage contract running for
a period not exceeding:
(1) six (6) years; or
(2) fifteen (15) years for a district that is purchasing the
firefighting equipment with funding from the:
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


(A) state or its instrumentalities; or
(B) federal government or its instrumentalities.
The purchase must be amortized in equal or approximately equal
installments payable on January 1 and July 1 each year.
Sec. 6. (a) Subject to section 7 of this chapter, the board, with
the approval of the county executive, may borrow the money
necessary to make a purchase of firefighting apparatus and
equipment from a financial institution in Indiana on the terms
described in section 8 of this chapter. The board shall execute and
deliver to the financial institution the negotiable note or bond of
the board for the sum borrowed. The note or bond must bear
interest, with both principal and interest payable in equal or
approximately equal installments on January 1 and July 1 each
year over a period not exceeding six (6) years.
(b) The first installment of principal and interest on a contract,
chattel mortgage, note, or bond is due on the next January 1 or
July 1 following the first tax collection for which it is possible for
the county to levy a tax. The county shall levy a tax each year
sufficient to pay the obligation according to its terms and shall
appropriate the proceeds of the tax for this purpose. An obligation
of the board executed under this chapter is a valid and binding
obligation of the board.
Sec. 7. (a) If the board determines that money should be
borrowed under section 6 of this chapter, not less than ten (10)
taxpayers in the county who disagree with the determination may
file a petition in the office of the county auditor not more than
thirty (30) days after notice of the determination is given. The
petition must state the taxpayers' objections and the reasons why
the taxpayers believe the borrowing to be unnecessary or unwise.
(b) The county auditor shall immediately certify a copy of the
petition, together with other data necessary to present the
questions involved, to the department of local government finance.
Upon receipt of the certified petition and other data, the
department of local government finance shall fix a date, time, and
place for the hearing of the matter. The hearing shall be held not
less than five (5) days and not more than thirty (30) days after the
receipt of the certified documents.
(c) The hearing may be held in the county where the petition
arose or through electronic means.
(d) Notice of the hearing shall be given by the department of
local government finance to the county and to the first ten (10)
petitioners listed on the petition by letter. The letter shall be sent
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


to each of the first ten (10) petitioners at the petitioner's usual
place of residence at least five (5) days before the date of the
hearing.
(e) A:
(1) taxpayer who signed a petition filed under subsection (a);
or
(2) board against which a petition under subsection (a) is
filed;
may petition for judicial review of the final determination of the
department of local government finance under this section. The
petition must be filed in the tax court not more than forty-five (45)
days after the date of the department's final determination.
Sec. 8. (a) All purchases of firefighting apparatus and
equipment under this chapter shall be made in the manner
provided by statute for the purchase of county supplies. If the
amount involved is sufficient to require notice under statutes for
bids in connection with the purchase of apparatus or equipment,
the notice must offer all bidders the opportunity of proposing to
sell the apparatus or equipment to the county upon a conditional
sale or mortgage contract.
(b) A bidder proposing to sell on a conditional sale or mortgage
contract shall state in the bidder's bid the proposed interest rate
and terms of the conditional sale or contract, to be considered by
the board in determining the best bid received.
(c) All bids submitted must specify the cash price at which the
bidder proposes to sell the apparatus or equipment to the county
so that the board may determine whether it is in the best interest
of the county to purchase the apparatus or equipment on the terms
of a conditional sale or mortgage contract proposed by the bidder
or to purchase the apparatus or equipment for cash if sufficient
funds are available or can be raised by negotiating a loan with a
financial institution in accordance with section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 9. A board having a regularly organized fire department
employing full-time firefighters may procure at the board's
expense:
(1) an insurance policy for each member of the fire
department insuring the member against loss of life or
dismemberment while in the performance of regularly
assigned duties; and
(2) group insurance providing supplemental income
protection for a member of the fire department who has been
injured during the course of employment.
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116


The insurance coverage shall be selected with the consent of the
members and is supplemental to other benefits provided to an
injured member by law.
Sec. 10. (a) A district shall pay for the care of a full-time, paid
firefighter who:
(1) suffers an injury; or
(2) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the firefighter's duty.
(b) The district shall pay for the following expenses incurred by
a firefighter described in subsection (a):
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents
and means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic services, including
during the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or
surgeon in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(c) A district that has paid for the care of a firefighter under
subsection (a) has a cause of action for reimbursement of the
amount paid under subsection (a) against any third party against
whom the firefighter has a cause of action for an injury sustained
because of, or an illness caused by, the third party. The district's
cause of action under this subsection is in addition to, and not in
lieu of, the cause of action of the firefighter against the third party.
SECTION 28. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare, as directed by the legislative council,
legislation for introduction in the 2027 regular session of the
general assembly to organize and correct statutes affected by this
act, if necessary.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 29. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) On or before
November 1, 2026, the department of local government finance
shall submit a report to the general assembly in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6, which includes any recommended
legislative changes needed to implement this act or would
otherwise assist in the transition of responsibilities from a township
to the county or county fire and emergency service district,
established under IC 36-8.1-5, as added by this act, in accordance
with this act.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 1352—LS 6996/DI 116